Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1465.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4906.1 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4906.1. False reports of child abuse.A person commits a misdemeanor of the [second] first degree if the person intentionally or knowingly makes a false report of child abuse under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services) or intentionally or knowingly induces a child to make a false claim of child abuse under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516